Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 18 Child Maltreatment Act
12-18-106. Cooperative agreements.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall implement a coordinated multidisciplinary team approach to intervention in reports involving severe maltreatment and all reports requested by a prosecuting attorney pertaining to a law enforcement or prosecuting attorney's investigation by initiating formal cooperative agreements with:

Law enforcement agencies;

Prosecuting attorneys; and

Other appropriate agencies and individuals.

The Secretary of the Department of Human Services may enter into cooperative agreements with other states to create a national child maltreatment registration system.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (a); and substituted “Director of the Department of Human Services” for “director” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (b).

A publicly supported school, facility, or institution acting in good faith by cooperating with the investigative agency under this chapter shall be immune from civil and criminal liability.

The amount and type of fetal tissue to be preserved under this section;

Procedures for the proper preservation of the tissue for the purpose of DNA testing and examination;

Procedures for documenting the chain of custody of the tissue for use as evidence;

Procedures for proper disposal of fetal tissue preserved under this section;

A uniform reporting instrument mandated to be utilized by physicians when submitting fetal tissue under this section which shall include the name and address of the physician submitting the fetal tissue and the name and complete address of residence of the parent or legal guardian of the child upon whom the abortion was performed; and

Procedures for communication with law enforcement agencies regarding evidence and information obtained under this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 725, § 1, provided: “Findings and purposes.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Children are increasingly being preyed upon, victimized, and coerced into illegal sexual relationships by adults;

“(2)The Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., requires caretakers, healthcare facilities, healthcare providers, teachers, and other specified individuals to report suspected incidents of sexual crimes against children;

“(3)The physical, emotional, developmental, and psychological impact of sexual crimes on child victims can be severe and long-lasting;

“(4)The societal costs of these crimes are also significant and affect the entire populace;

“(5)The collection, maintenance, and preservation of evidence, including forensic tissue samples, furthers Arkansas's interest in protecting children from sexual crimes and provides the state with the tools necessary for successful investigations and prosecutions;

“(6)Parents and guardians have both the right and responsibility to be involved in medical treatment decisions involving their children, and no one has the right to knowingly or willfully impede or circumvent this right;

“(7)(A)There are documented cases of individuals other than a parent or guardian aiding, abetting, and assisting minor girls to procure abortions without their parents' or guardians' knowledge, consent, or involvement.

“(B)These activities of individuals other than a parent or guardian include transporting children across state lines to avoid Arkansas's parental involvement requirements for abortion; and

“(8)Such actions violate both the sanctity of the familial relationship and Arkansas's parental involvement law concerning abortion.

“(b)The General Assembly's purposes in enacting the Child Maltreatment Act are to further the important and compelling state interests of:

“(1)Protecting children from sexually predatory adults;

“(2)Ensuring that adults who are involved in illegal sexual relationships or contact with children are reported, investigated, and, when warranted, prosecuted;

“(3)(A)Relieving medical professionals and other mandatory reporters of suspected sexual crimes against children from any responsibility to personally investigate an allegation or suspicion.

“(B)Mandatory reporters must simply report allegations, suspicions, and pertinent facts.

“(C)Trained law enforcement or social services personnel are responsible for any investigation and for the ultimate disposition of the allegation or case;

“(4)Reducing the physical, emotional, developmental, and psychological impact of sexual crimes on child victims;

“(5)Reducing the societal and economic burden on the populace that results from sexual crimes against children;

“(6)Providing law enforcement officials with the tools and evidence necessary to investigate and prosecute child predators; and

“(7)Protecting and respecting the right of parents and guardians to be involved in the medical decisions and treatment of their children and preventing anyone from knowingly or willfully subverting or circumventing these rights.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “seventeen (17)” for “fourteen (14)” in (a)(1).

Reasonable cause to suspect that a child has been subjected to child maltreatment;

Reasonable cause to suspect that a child has died as a result of child maltreatment; or

Observes a child being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would reasonably result in child maltreatment; and

Knowingly fails to notify the Child Abuse Hotline of the child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment.

Defendant's proposed jury instructions were properly denied where she failed to report child abuse to a hotline for two weeks because the instructions were not a correct statement of the law; defendant's instructions incorrectly stated that there was no requirement to report if the reasonable cause to suspect arose after the victim had attained her 18th birthday.Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

Defendant's proposed jury instructions relating to the responsibilities of a child abuse hotline were properly denied where she failed to report child abuse to a hotline for two weeks because the hotline responsibility statute, §12-18-306, was not relevant to defendant's conviction under this section on the charge of failing to report.Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

Prosecution must prove that a person is a “mandated reporter” in order to show a violation of this section relating to mandatory reporting of child abuse; therefore, the jury was properly instructed as to the requirement of immediacy when it was given the statutory definition of a mandated reporter, along with the other statutory definitions of relevant terms, such as “child” and “child maltreatment.”Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

Section 12-18-306 did not dictate a contrary result where defendant was convicted for failing to make a report of child abuse, as it was found in a separate subchapter discussing the responsibilities of the child-abuse hotline, and it did not affect the unambiguous language governing mandated reporters found in this section. Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion by failing to admit evidence relating to an agency's statutory interpretation because the hotline personnel's opinion and interpretation of a separate statute relating solely to the duties of the child-abuse hotline, §12-18-306, were not relevant to defendant's intent, as a mandated reporter, in failing to comply with the reporting requirements under this section.Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

Defendant could not complain that inclusion of the word “immediately” in §12-18-402 rendered the statute vague, as her conduct of purposely delaying making a report to the child abuse hotline for more than two weeks after acquiring direct knowledge of the child maltreatment clearly did not satisfy the requirement of immediacy that was placed on a mandated reporter.Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

This section contains no limitation for a situation where a child is 18 when the maltreatment is discovered; instead, the statute is written in the past tense to include a child who has been subjected to child maltreatment. Therefore, the evidence was sufficient to support a conviction under this section in a case where defendant did not learn about the abuse until after the victim was 18.Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

Failure to notify by a mandated reporter in the first degree is a Class A misdemeanor.

A person commits the offense of failure to notify by a mandated reporter in the second degree if he or she:

Reasonable cause to suspect that a child has been subjected to child maltreatment;

Reasonable cause to suspect that a child has died as a result of child maltreatment; or

Observes a child being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would reasonably result in child maltreatment; and

Recklessly fails to notify the Child Abuse Hotline of the child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment.

Because a school principal admitted that she knew the allegation of child abuse to be true, this section could not possibly be applied to her.Struble v. Blytheville Sch. Dist., 2017 Ark. App. 99, 516 S.W.3d 269 (2017).

Failure to notify by a mandated reporter in the second degree is a Class C misdemeanor.

A person commits the offense of making a false report under this chapter if he or she purposely makes a report containing a false allegation to the Child Abuse Hotline knowing the allegation to be false.

(1)A first offense of making a false report under this chapter is a Class A misdemeanor.

(1)An employer or supervisor of an employee identified as a mandated reporter commits the offense of unlawful restriction of child abuse reporting if he or she:

Prohibits a mandated reporter under this chapter from making a report of child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment to the Child Abuse Hotline;

Requires that a mandated reporter under this chapter receive permission or notify a person before the mandated reporter makes a report of child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment to the Child Abuse Hotline; or

Knowingly retaliates against a mandated reporter under this chapter for reporting child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment to the Child Abuse Hotline.

(A)Nothing in this section shall prohibit any person or institution from requiring a mandatory reporter employed or serving as a volunteer for a person or institution to inform a representative of that person or institution that the reporter has made a report to the Child Abuse Hotline.

Information disclosed to a person or institution under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall not be shared outside the organization and may only be shared within the organization to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the child.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the introductory language in (a)(1); substituted “or notify a person” for “from the person” in (a)(1)(B); and added (a)(2)(B).

Unlawful restriction of child abuse reporting is a Class A misdemeanor.

A person commits the offense of unlawful disclosure of data or information under this chapter if the person knowingly discloses data or information to a person to whom disclosure is not permitted by this chapter.

Unlawful disclosure of data or information under this chapter is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §
5157.

12-18-107. Liability.

A person or agency required by this chapter to report suspected child maltreatment who acts in good faith in making notification, the taking of a photograph or radiological test, or the removal of a child while exercising a seventy-two-hour hold is immune to suit and to civil and criminal liability.

If acting in good faith, a person making notification not named in this section is immune from liability.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-108. Maintenance of forensic samples from abortions performed on a child.

(1)A physician who performs an abortion on a child who is less than seventeen (17) years of age at the time of the abortion shall preserve under this subchapter fetal tissue extracted during the abortion in accordance with rules adopted by the office of the State Crime Laboratory.

Before submitting the tissue under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the physician shall redact protected health information as required under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191.

The physician or the reporting medical facility shall contact the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the child resides.

The State Crime Laboratory shall adopt rules prescribing:

Failure of a physician to comply with this section or any rule adopted under this section shall constitute unprofessional conduct under the Arkansas Medical Practices Act, §17-95-201 et seq., §17-95-301 et seq., and §17-95-401 et seq.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 725, § 5; 2017, No. 1018, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Offenses and Penalties

12-18-201. Failure to notify by a mandated reporter in the first degree.

A person commits the offense of failure to notify by a mandated reporter in the first degree if he or she:

Is a mandated reporter under this chapter;

Has:

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-202. Failure to notify by a mandated reporter in the second degree.

Is a mandated reporter under this chapter;

Has:

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-203. Making a false report under this chapter.

A subsequent offense of making a false report under this chapter is a Class D felony.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-204. Unlawful restriction of child abuse reporting.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1086, § 6.

12-18-205. Unlawful disclosure of data or information under this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-206. Civil liability for failure to report.

A person required by this chapter to make a report of child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment to the Child Abuse Hotline who purposely fails to do so is civilly liable for damages proximately caused by that failure.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-207. Judicial and prosecutorial disclosure.

A judge or prosecuting attorney who fails to make a report when required by this chapter is immune from criminal and civil liability under this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-208. Subsequent disclosure by a subject of a report.

This chapter does not prevent subsequent disclosure by a subject of the report.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-209. Imposition of penalties.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police, or a prosecuting attorney, may file a petition in the appropriate court seeking imposition of penalties for violation of this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 4.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police”.

12-18-210. Prohibition on intentionally causing, aiding, abetting, or assisting a child to obtain an abortion without parental consent.

A person shall not intentionally cause, aid, or assist a child to obtain an abortion without the consent or notification regarding judicial bypass of the requirement for consent under §§ 20-16-801, 20-16-804, and 20-16-805.

Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not affect § 20-16-808.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be civilly liable to the child and to the person or persons required to give the consent under § 20-16-801.

A court may award:

Damages to the person or persons adversely affected by a violation of subsection (a) of this section, including compensation for emotional injury without the need for personal presence at the act or event; and

Attorney's fees, litigation costs, and punitive damages.

An adult who engages in or consents to another person's engaging in a sexual act with a child in violation of the Arkansas Criminal Code, § 5-1-101 et seq., that results in the child's pregnancy shall not be awarded damages under this section.

An unemancipated child does not have capacity to consent to any action in violation of this section.

Upon a petition by any person adversely affected or who reasonably may be adversely affected by the conduct, a court of competent jurisdiction may enjoin conduct that would violate this section upon a showing that the conduct:

Is reasonably anticipated to occur in the future; or

Has occurred in the past, whether with the same child or others, and that it is not unreasonable to expect that the conduct will be repeated.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 725, § 1, provided: “Findings and purposes.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Children are increasingly being preyed upon, victimized, and coerced into illegal sexual relationships by adults;

“(2)The Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., requires caretakers, healthcare facilities, healthcare providers, teachers, and other specified individuals to report suspected incidents of sexual crimes against children;

“(3)The physical, emotional, developmental, and psychological impact of sexual crimes on child victims can be severe and long-lasting;

“(4)The societal costs of these crimes are also significant and affect the entire populace;

“(5)The collection, maintenance, and preservation of evidence, including forensic tissue samples, furthers Arkansas's interest in protecting children from sexual crimes and provides the state with the tools necessary for successful investigations and prosecutions;

“(6)Parents and guardians have both the right and responsibility to be involved in medical treatment decisions involving their children, and no one has the right to knowingly or willfully impede or circumvent this right;

“(7)(A)There are documented cases of individuals other than a parent or guardian aiding, abetting, and assisting minor girls to procure abortions without their parents' or guardians' knowledge, consent, or involvement.

“(B)These activities of individuals other than a parent or guardian include transporting children across state lines to avoid Arkansas's parental involvement requirements for abortion; and

“(8)Such actions violate both the sanctity of the familial relationship and Arkansas's parental involvement law concerning abortion.

“(b)The General Assembly's purposes in enacting the Child Maltreatment Act are to further the important and compelling state interests of:

“(1)Protecting children from sexually predatory adults;

“(2)Ensuring that adults who are involved in illegal sexual relationships or contact with children are reported, investigated, and, when warranted, prosecuted;

“(3)(A)Relieving medical professionals and other mandatory reporters of suspected sexual crimes against children from any responsibility to personally investigate an allegation or suspicion.

“(B)Mandatory reporters must simply report allegations, suspicions, and pertinent facts.

“(C)Trained law enforcement or social services personnel are responsible for any investigation and for the ultimate disposition of the allegation or case;

“(4)Reducing the physical, emotional, developmental, and psychological impact of sexual crimes on child victims;

“(5)Reducing the societal and economic burden on the populace that results from sexual crimes against children;

“(6)Providing law enforcement officials with the tools and evidence necessary to investigate and prosecute child predators; and

“(7)Protecting and respecting the right of parents and guardians to be involved in the medical decisions and treatment of their children and preventing anyone from knowingly or willfully subverting or circumventing these rights.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b).

An allegation of child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment, that if found to be true, would constitute child maltreatment as defined under this chapter;

The death of a child who died suddenly and unexpectedly; or

The death of a child reported by a coroner or county sheriff under § 20-15-502;

Sufficient identifying information is provided to identify and locate the child or the child's family; and

The child or the child's family is present in Arkansas or the incident occurred in Arkansas.

The prosecuting attorney; or

A law enforcement agency.

Data identifying a reporter under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be maintained under §12-18-502.

If the incident occurred in Arkansas and the victim, offender, or victim's parents no longer reside in Arkansas, the Child Abuse Hotline shall accept the report and the Arkansas investigating agency shall contact the other state and request assistance in completing the investigation, including an interview with the out-of-state subject of the report.

(1)If the Child Abuse Hotline receives a report and the alleged offender is a resident of the State of Arkansas and the report of child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment in the state or country in which the act occurred would also be child maltreatment in Arkansas at the time the incident occurred, the Child Abuse Hotline shall refer the report to the appropriate investigating agency within the state so that the Arkansas investigative agency can investigate alone or in concert with the investigative agency of any other state or country that may be involved.

A report of child maltreatment that does not meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section shall not be accepted by the Child Abuse Hotline.

The Child Abuse Hotline may accept a report of child maltreatment that does not meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section if sufficient information is provided to accept the report under §§ 12-18-304 — 12-18-310.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall establish procedures for the Child Abuse Hotline.

The procedures established by the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall include without limitation the:

Creation of a secondary review of an accepted report of child maltreatment by the investigating agency assigned under § 12-18-601 to ensure that the report of child maltreatment meets the requirements of this section; and

Ability of the Child Abuse Hotline and the investigating agency to contact the Department of Human Services to obtain or determine information relevant to whether a report of child maltreatment should be accepted.

A report of child maltreatment that does not meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section shall be considered screened-out for the purposes of releasing information under § 12-18-910.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 802, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)All members of society desire the safety of all children;

“(2)A child raised under constant adult supervision may miss opportunities for growth that will negatively impact his or her mental and physical development;

“(3)The alarming rise of childhood obesity and diabetes is almost certainly linked to an increase in the sedentary lifestyle and lack of physical activity for children today, which is often encouraged by parents and guardians, including without limitation by insisting on driving their children to school;

“(4)As measured by incidences of mental health difficulties, the over-supervised youth of today experience more difficulties when they reach adulthood than earlier generations;

“(5)Earlier generations learned resilience by walking, bicycling, playing, helping, and solving problems without constant adult intervention;

“(6)Parents and guardians are often in the best position to weigh the risk and make decisions concerning the safety of children under their care, including without limitation where their child may go, with whom, and when; and

“(7)Parents and guardians who have done nothing more than briefly and safely permitted their children to remain unsupervised should not be subject to investigation and possible prosecution as it causes unnecessary governmental intrusion and diversion of valuable public resources.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act:

“(1)Protect and promote the inherent right of a parent or guardian to raise his or her children;

“(2)Protect the decision of a parent or a guardian to grant his or her children unsupervised time to engage in activities that include without limitation playing outside, walking to school, bicycling, remaining briefly in a vehicle, and remaining at home; and

“(3)Ensure that valuable public resources are used most effectively to protect children by providing a secondary review to ensure that:

“(A)Calls to the Child Abuse Hotline are properly accepted;

“(B)Child maltreatment investigations are closed when the results of the investigation indicate that the allegations lack merit; and

“(C)Only the names of offenders who pose a risk to a vulnerable population are placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (b)(1), substituted “document receipt of” for “screen out”, deleted “screened-out” following “forward the”, and added “or the equivalent governmental agency of the state or country where the alleged offender resides”; and added (b)(2) and (b)(3).

The 2015 amendment deleted “of child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment” following “report” in the introductory language of (a); and rewrote (a)(1).

The 2017 amendment inserted the comma following “maltreatment” in (a)(1)(A); and rewrote (a)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment added (e).

Throwing, kicking, burning, biting, or cutting a child;

Striking a child with a closed fist;

Shaking a child four (4) years of age or older; or

Striking a child seven (7) years of age or older on the face or on the head.

A report under this subsection shall not be determined to be true unless the child suffered an injury as the result of the act.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report of child maltreatment if any of the following intentional or knowing acts are alleged to occur:

Pinching, biting, or striking a child in the genital area.

Within the past fourteen (14) days; and

As a result of child maltreatment as described under subsections (a)-(c) of this section.

However, the report under this subsection shall not be determined to be true unless the existence of the bruise is corroborated.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall not accept a report of environmental neglect pertaining to head lice unless the:

The Child Abuse Hotline shall not accept a report of giving a child or permitting a child to consume or inhale a poisonous or noxious substance as described in § 12-18-103(3)(A)(vii)(f) unless the alleged incident occurred within the previous three (3) months.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report regarding educational neglect if the:

Report alleges that a parent, custodian, or guardian of a child who is at least (6) years of age and under eighteen (18) years of age failed to enroll the child in school and lawfully home-school the child; or

Report alleges that:

An act or omission of a parent, custodian, or guardian of a child who is at least six (6) years of age and under eighteen (18) years of age caused the child to be absent from school;

The child's absence from school was not caused by the refusal of the child to attend school;

The child has been habitually absent from school without justification; and

The child's absence from school has had a negative impact on the child's performance at school.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “child maltreatment” for “physical abuse” throughout the section; and added (e).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1026 added (f).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1215 rewrote (e); and added (g).

The 2019 amendment substituted “shall accept a report regarding educational neglect if the” for “shall accept each call regarding educational neglect” in the introductory language of (g); and added (g)(1) and (g)(2).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 725, § 6.

Subchapter 3

— Child Abuse Hotline

12-18-301. Creation.

There is created the Child Abuse Hotline.

The Child Abuse Hotline is a unit established within the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police, or their designee, with the purpose of receiving and recording notifications and reports under this chapter.

(1)The Child Abuse Hotline shall be staffed twenty-four (24) hours per day and shall have statewide accessibility through a toll-free telephone number.

The toll-free telephone number under this section shall be known as the “Child Abuse Hotline”.

All persons whether a mandated reporter under this chapter or not may use the Child Abuse Hotline to report child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 5873.

12-18-302. Reports by mandated reporters.

As prescribed under this section, a mandated reporter under this chapter may report child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment by telephone call, facsimile transmission, or online reporting.

Facsimile transmission and online reporting may be used in nonemergency situations by an identified mandated reporter under this chapter who provides the following contact information:

Name and phone number; and

In the case of online reporting, the email address of the identified mandated reporter under this chapter.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall provide confirmation of the receipt of a facsimile transmission via a return facsimile transmission or via online receipt.

A mandated reporter under this chapter who wishes to remain anonymous shall make a report through the Child Abuse Hotline toll-free telephone system.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-303. Minimum requirements for a report to be accepted.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report if:

The report is of:

(1)If the alleged offender resides in another state and the incident occurred in another state or country, the Child Abuse Hotline shall document receipt of the report, transfer the report to the Child Abuse Hotline of the state or country where the alleged offender resides or the incident occurred, and, if child protection is an issue, forward the report to the Department of Human Services or the equivalent governmental agency of the state or country where the alleged offender resides.

Any record of receipt of a report under subdivision (b)(1) of this section may be used only within the Department of Human Services for purposes of administration of the program and shall not be disclosed except to:

The Arkansas investigating agency shall make an investigative determination and shall provide notice to the alleged offender that, if the allegation is determined to be true, the offender's name will be placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

The other state may also conduct an investigation in this state that results in the offender's being named in a true report in that state and placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry of that state.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 6; 2015, No. 1211, § 2; 2017, No. 250, § 11; 2019, No. 802, § 2.

12-18-304. Qualifying reports of certain types of child maltreatment.

(1)The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report of child maltreatment if any of the following intentional or knowing acts are alleged to occur:

Shaking a child three (3) years of age or younger;

Striking a child six (6) years of age or younger on the face or on the head;

Interfering with a child's breathing; or

(1)The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report of child maltreatment if a child suffers an injury as the result of a restraint.

The report shall be determined not to be true if the injury is a minor temporary mark or causes transient pain and was an acceptable restraint as provided under this chapter.

(1)The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report of child maltreatment involving a bruise to a child even if at the time of the report the bruise is not visible if the bruising occurred:

Head lice is chronic; or

Alleged victim currently has sores that require immediate medical attention.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1486, § 1; 2015, No. 1026, § 3; 2015, No. 1215, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 554, § 3.

12-18-305. Garrett's Law reports.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report of neglect as defined under §12-18-103(14)(B) only if the reporter is one (1) of the following mandated reporters and the mandated reporter has reasonable cause to suspect that a child has been subjected to neglect as defined under §12-18-103(14)(B):

A licensed nurse;

Any medical personnel who may be engaged in the admission, examination, care, or treatment of persons;

An osteopath;

A physician;

A resident intern;

A surgeon; or

A social worker in a hospital.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The catchline of this section is derived from Acts 2005, No. 1176, § 1: This act shall be known and may be cited as “Garrett’s Law: To Provide Services to a Newborn Child Born with an Illegal Substance Present in the Child’s System”.Acts 2005, No. 1176, § 5, amended former §12-12-507(f) to add provisions substantially similar to this section.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-306. Reports naming an adult as the victim.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report of child sexual abuse, sexual contact, or sexual exploitation naming as the victim a person who is now an adult only if:

The alleged offender is a caretaker of a child; and

The person making the report is one (1) of the following:

The adult victim;

A law enforcement officer; or

The alleged offender.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment in the introductory language inserted “child” before “sexual abuse” and substituted “as the victim a person who is now an adult” for “an adult as the victim”; deleted former (2)(C) and (D) and redesignated former (E) as (C).

Defendant's proposed jury instructions relating to the responsibilities of a child abuse hotline were properly denied where she failed to report child abuse to a hotline for two weeks because the hotline responsibility statute was not relevant to defendant's conviction on the charge of failing to report under §12-18-201.Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

This section did not dictate a contrary result where defendant was convicted for failing to make a report of child abuse under §12-18-201, as this section was found in a separate subchapter discussing the responsibilities of the child-abuse hotline, and it did not affect the unambiguous language governing mandated reporters found in §12-18-201.Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion by failing to admit evidence relating to an agency's statutory interpretation because the hotline personnel's opinion and interpretation of this section, relating solely to the duties of the child-abuse hotline, were not relevant to defendant's intent, as a mandated reporter, in failing to comply with the reporting requirements of §12-18-201.Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 8.

12-18-307. Reports alleging Munchausen syndrome by proxy or factitious illness.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report of child maltreatment alleging Munchausen syndrome by proxy or factitious illness only if the reporter is a medical professional.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-308. Reports of injury to a child's intellectual, emotional, or psychological development.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept a report of injury to a child's intellectual, emotional, or psychological development as evidenced by observable and substantial impairment of the child's ability to function within the child's normal range of performance and behavior only if the reporter is:

A medical or mental health professional;

A school counselor, if the child did not disclose to the teacher;

A teacher; or

A day care center worker.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted (2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 784, § 1.

12-18-309. Reports alleging that a child is disrupting his or her adoption or is a dependent juvenile.

The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept telephone calls or other communications alleging that a child is at risk of disrupting or has disrupted his or her adoption or that a child is a dependent juvenile, as defined in §9-27-303, and shall immediately refer this information to the Department of Human Services.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 779, § 18; 2013, No. 1006, § 9; 2015, No. 1092, § 5.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “juvenile”.

The 2013 amendment substituted “dependent” for “dependent neglected” in the section heading and in section text; and substituted “9-27-303” for “9-27-303(18)”.

The 2015 amendment inserted “disrupting his or her adoption or” in the section heading; and inserted “is at risk of disrupting or has disrupted his or her adoption or that a child” in the section text.